Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 151 Geology and Water Resources
151.186.
Appeals from final orders.

Appeals may be taken from all final orders of the cabinet. Within thirty (30) days from entry of the final order the appeal shall be taken to the Circuit Court of the county where the structure or activity which is the subject of the order is located. The party or parties affected by the final order shall file in the Circuit Court a petition which states fully the grounds upon which a review is sought and assign all errors relied on. The cabinet shall be named respondent, and service shall be had on the secretary. Summons shall be issued upon the petition directing the cabinet to send its entire record, properly bound, to the clerk of the Circuit Court after certifying that such record is its entire original record or a true copy thereof, which shall be filed by the clerk of the Circuit Court and considered by the Circuit Court on the review. After the case has been properly docketed in the Circuit Court, any party directly affected by the issues on appeal may, upon notice to the parties and upon proper showing and in the discretion of the court, be permitted to intervene. Upon hearing of the appeal, the findings of the cabinet shall be prima facie evidence of the facts found therein. The court shall review the entire record and the findings and final order of the cabinet.

Appeals to the Court of Appeals from orders of the Circuit Court shall be taken in the manner provided in the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 253, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 215, § 5, effective July 14, 1992.

151.190.
Judicial review on appeal — Procedure. [Repealed.]

151.200.
Temporary allocation of water supply among users — Permit for transfer or diversion of water between streams or watersheds.

Notwithstanding the existence of any permits for the withdrawal, diversion, or transfer of public water, in times of drought, emergency, or other similar situations requiring a balancing of the rights and available water between water users, the cabinet, upon declaration of a water emergency by the Governor, may temporarily allocate the available public water supply among water users and restrict the water withdrawal rights of permit holders, until such time as the condition is relieved and the best interests of the public are served.

The cabinet, with the approval of the secretary, may issue a permit for the transfer or diversion of public water from one (1) stream or watershed area to another, where such transfer is consistent with the wise use of the public water of the Commonwealth and is in the best interests of the public. Prior to issuance of the permit the applicant shall publish a public notice soliciting written comments on the proposed permit in the newspaper or newspapers having greatest circulation in the area of the stream reach from which the withdrawal is taken. The applicant shall also send written notice to water withdrawal permit holders that might be affected by the permit. Thirty (30) days shall be allowed for public comments on the proposed permit.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 24; 1986, ch. 183, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

151.210.
Use of water by landowner for domestic purposes — Impounding and conserving water, permitted when.

Any owner of land contiguous to public water shall at all times have the right to the use of water therefrom to satisfy his needs for domestic purposes, which shall include water for household purposes, drinking water for poultry, livestock and domestic animals. The use of water for such domestic purposes shall have priority and be superior to any and all other uses.

An owner or group of owners of land contiguous to public water, operating under a withdrawal permit, shall have the right to impound and conserve water for their use by impounding such water behind a dam in the natural stream bed or on their land, when the flow of the stream or level of the lake is such that the impounding will not impair existing uses, or will not unreasonably interfere with a beneficial use by other water users. An obstruction placed across a natural stream shall be approved by the cabinet as provided in KRS 151.250, and shall provide an outlet for the release of water which the owner is not entitled to use or withdraw under KRS Chapters 146, 149, 151, 262, 350.029 and 433.750 to 433.757, and the owner shall operate the outlet in accordance with this provision.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 25.

151.220.
Water resources studies.

The cabinet shall:

Undertake for and as the official agency of the state, such studies and prepare such reports and recommendations as may be necessary to establish a statewide program of flood control (including major drainage), and a statewide program for the development of water resources;

Study and review for the state as its official agency, all survey reports, engineering reports, and other reports concerning or affecting water related projects within the state which are proposed for construction by the federal government, the state government or any agency or subdivision thereof, or which will involve the expenditure of federal or state funds, and which might affect flood control or the development of water resources of the state, and to act as the official representative of the state in any representations, recommendations, or requests to Congress or the General Assembly concerning such projects or the priority which should be accorded them with relation to the statewide program;

Make a continuous water resources study of data from other existing state or federal agencies and such other sources as may be available. From such studies, the cabinet shall formulate conclusions and recommendations for use by the Commonwealth in assuring the maximum beneficial use of the water resources of the Commonwealth;

Cooperate with any local, state or federal agency, or the agencies of any other state engaged or proposing to engage in any work which will affect or be affected by the functions of the cabinet and may lend to or receive from any such agency such financial assistance as may be necessary within the limits of authorized expenditure;

Have, for flood control and water resources development purposes, jurisdiction over all streams within or bordering upon the state. The cabinet shall have the authority to establish and enforce floodways along such streams;

Have authority to accept and use gifts, contributions, donations and grants;

Be the official state agency for determination of stream mileage.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 26; 1974, ch. 285, § 7.

151.230.
Minimum standards for flood plain management to be set by administrative regulation — Local application and effect.

The cabinet may establish minimum standards by administrative regulation for floodplain management. Except in local governments containing a city of the first class, local governments may establish their own standards by ordinance.

In counties containing a city of the first class that have adopted a floodplain ordinance, standards relating to substantial improvements to a structure damaged by flood waters shall not be more restrictive than that prescribed by the cabinet.

For purposes of county administrative regulations and ordinances relating to floodplain management, “substantial improvement” as used in subsection (2) of this section shall mean any combination of repairs, reconstruction, alteration, or improvements to a structure taking place during a one (1) year period in which the cumulative cost equals or exceeds fifty percent (50%) of the market value of the structure.

On March 29, 2000, for purposes of floodplain management, all property shall be assessed by the property valuation administrator at one hundred percent (100%) of its fair market value with no loss of value to land or structures incurred as a result of any previous flood damage prior to March 29, 2000. The fair market value of a structure shall be reestablished as that value calculated by the property valuation administrator on or before December 30 of each year.

The provisions of subsections (3) and (4) of this section shall expire on December 31, 2002, unless reenacted by the local governing body. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a county containing a city of the first class from amending its own floodplain ordinance at any time.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 27; 2000, ch. 243, § 1, effective March 29, 2000.

151.232.
Participation in development of administrative regulations. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 307, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; repealed by 2017 ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

151.240.
Surveys of project on behalf of state.

On its own initiative or when so directed by the Governor, the cabinet shall make a preliminary survey and report of any project which involves or might involve expenditure of state funds or construction work by the State of Kentucky in the construction, reconstruction, or maintenance of any flood control works or other works concerning or affecting the development of water resources. If the cabinet, with the approval of the Governor, finds from such preliminary survey that the project is not favorable, no further action shall be taken on such project without specific instructions or authorization by the General Assembly. If the cabinet finds from such preliminary survey that such project is favorable on a basis of need, economic value or future development, it shall, with the approval of the Governor, cause a comprehensive final survey and report to be prepared, and submit such report to the Governor for approval and authority to perform the necessary construction work.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 28.

151.250.
Plans for dams, levees, etc. to be approved and permit issued by cabinet — Jurisdiction of Department for Natural Resources.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person and no city, county, or other political subdivision of the state, including levee districts, drainage districts, flood control districts or systems, or similar bodies, shall commence the construction, reconstruction, relocation or improvement of any dam, embankment, levee, dike, bridge, fill or other obstruction (except those constructed by the Department of Highways) across or along any stream, or in the floodway of any stream, unless the plans and specifications for such work have been submitted by the person or political subdivision responsible for the construction, reconstruction or improvement and such plans and specifications have been approved in writing by the cabinet and a permit issued. However, the cabinet by regulation may exempt those dams, embankments or other obstructions which are not of such size or type as to require approval by the cabinet in the interest of safety or retention of water supply.

No person, city, county or other political subdivision of the state shall commence the filling of any area with earth, debris, or any other material, or raise the level of any area in any manner, or place a building, barrier or obstruction of any sort on any area located adjacent to a river or stream or in the floodway of the stream so that such filling, raising or obstruction will in any way affect the flow of water in the channel or in the floodway of the stream unless plans and specifications for such work have been submitted to and approved by the cabinet and a permit issued as required in subsection (1) above.

Nothing in this section is intended to give the cabinet any jurisdiction or control over the construction, reconstruction, improvement, enlargement, maintenance or operation of any drainage district, ditch, or system established for agricultural purposes, or to require approval of the same except where such obstruction of the stream or floodway is determined by the cabinet to be a detriment or hindrance to the beneficial use of water resources in the area, and the person or political subdivision in control thereof so notified. The Department for Natural Resources through KRS Chapter 350 shall have exclusive jurisdiction over KRS Chapter 151 concerning the regulation of dams, levees, embankments, dikes, bridges, fills, or other obstructions across or along any stream or in the floodway of any stream which structures are permitted under KRS Chapter 350 for surface coal mining operations.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 29; 1982, ch. 368, § 2, effective April 2, 1982.

151.260.
Applications for permit — Time for approval or rejection.

All applications for permits required by KRS 151.250 shall be in the form and manner prescribed by the cabinet.

Unless waived by the cabinet, all plans and specifications submitted for approval shall be drawn by an engineer, licensed to practice as a professional engineer under the provisions of KRS Chapter 322.

Upon receipt of all plans and specifications, the cabinet shall notify the applicant in writing within twenty (20) working days either that the permit will be issued or denied, or that certain modifications in the plans or specifications must be made before a permit will be issued.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 30.

151.270.
Judicial review of denial of permit. [Repealed.]

151.280.
Commencement of preparations for project without permit prohibited — Deviation from approved plans.

Any person, county, city or other political subdivision of the state who shall begin on the site preparation for the construction, reconstruction, relocation or improvement of any project prior to the issuance of the permit required in KRS 151.250 shall be considered as commencing without a permit and punishable by penalties provided in KRS 151.990.

Whenever plans and specifications have been approved in writing and a permit issued by the cabinet, no person, city, county, or other political subdivision shall deviate from the approved plans in the construction, reconstruction, relocation or improvement unless such change is submitted in writing to the cabinet and prior approval is received from the cabinet in writing before proceeding with the work. Any substantial deviation from the approved plans shall be construed as commencing without a permit and punishable by the penalties provided in KRS 151.990.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 32.

151.290.
Inspection of dam, embankment or levee — Orders for remedy — Judicial review — Mandatory injunction. [Repealed.]

151.291.
Responsibility for safety of water barriers owned by Commonwealth — Transfer of ownership of water barrier — Responsibility for safety after transfer — Approval of transfer.

The cabinet shall enforce compliance with all applicable laws and regulations of all dams, reservoirs, levees, embankments, or other water barriers owned by the Commonwealth.

The cabinet may take whatever action that it deems necessary to maintain, repair or remove dams, reservoirs, levees, embankments, or other water barriers owned, acquired or constructed by the Commonwealth.

Funds expended pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section may not be expended for any aesthetic or functional purposes that are not related to the safety or integrity of the water barrier.

Any person to whom the Commonwealth has transferred ownership of any dam, reservoir, levee, embankment or other water barrier shall maintain it in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations. The Commonwealth shall not expend funds to maintain, repair or remove any structure the ownership of which it has transferred after July 15, 1986, unless otherwise expressly provided by law or written agreement.

The secretary of the cabinet shall review and approve or disapprove every proposed transfer of any water barrier owned by the Commonwealth. No transfer of any water barrier owned by the Commonwealth shall occur except upon approval of the secretary of the cabinet. The secretary shall ensure that every proposed transfer is consistent with the terms and provisions of this section. Nothing herein shall be construed, however, to prevent the transfer of a water barrier by the Commonwealth without first bringing it into compliance with existing laws and regulations.

History.
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 206, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 290, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

151.293.
Certificates of inspection.

Within sixty (60) days of completion of an on-site inspection of an existing dam, the cabinet may either grant a certificate of inspection, or deny the certificate of inspection and notify the owner in writing, stating the reasons for denial.

In deciding whether or not a certificate of inspection should be issued, the cabinet shall take into account all pertinent facts and conditions, but shall not issue a certificate unless the following conditions have been met:

The proposed action in the judgment of the cabinet will be conducted in such a way that the safety of the public is adequately provided for;

All information requested by the cabinet has been provided; and

The changed flow of the stream or level of the reservoir will not significantly interfere with a beneficial use by other water users.

In granting a certificate of inspection, the cabinet may impose such conditions relating to the inspection, operation, maintenance, alteration, repair, use, or control of a dam or reservoir as it determines are necessary for the protection of public health, safety or welfare.

The cabinet may establish hazard categories for dams based on downstream floodplain use, size, or type of dam, or other criteria, and may impose different conditions or types of conditions on the approval of dams or reservoirs in the different categories. The hazard categories in all cases shall be based only on the actual risk imposed by the dam.

The cabinet may utilize the results and information provided by or for the United States Army Corps of Engineers pursuant to the provisions of Public Law 92-367 if the information is not more than one (1) year old at the time of use.

Certificates of inspection shall be for a definite period of time, not to exceed five (5) years, as determined by the cabinet and stated on the certificate. In determining the period of inspection, the cabinet may take account of any circumstances pertinent to the situation, including, but not limited to, the size and type of dam, topography, geology, soil conditions, hydrology, climate, use of the reservoir, the lands lying in the floodplain downstream from the dam, and the hazard category of the dam.

The cabinet may modify a certificate of inspection or the conditions attached to it. Such modification shall become effective ninety (90) days following issuance by the cabinet of a revised certificate, except when the cabinet finds that a state of emergency exists and that life or property would be endangered by delay. In case of an emergency declared by the cabinet, the new conditions shall be effective immediately.

Specific guidelines for issuance and renewal of certificate of inspection for earth embankment dams shall be provided by administrative regulations which shall address at least the following areas:

The hydraulic capacity requirements for each category of dam shall be provided. The probable maximum precipitation as determined by the United States Weather Service shall be used only where it can be clearly demonstrated that failure of the dam by overtopping would result in greater loss of life than would occur if the dam did not exist and only for small watersheds, since such large rainfall events are not expected to occur over large areas. The cabinet shall provide a table of factors that reduce this rainfall appropriately for larger watersheds;

Minimum criteria for the embankment stability of the dam, including consideration of such factors as steepness of slopes, strength of materials, and earthquake loadings shall be specified;

Variance procedures for applicable hydraulic and stability considerations shall be included for, but not limited to, variances to hydraulic criteria where only a small number of persons are at risk and where a reliable, effective emergency preparedness system will be installed; where a risk analysis demonstrates that at rainfall levels less than that specified in the administrative regulation there is no risk that actually results from the dam; where an owner can demonstrate that the dam substantially conforms to the criteria in the administrative regulation; and, for dams that pose a risk of economic damages only, where the owner provides indemnification against potential damages;

Before any variance is issued, the affected public shall be notified of the cabinet’s intended action and allowed to make known any objections or concerns that it might have;

Whenever the owner of a dam has requested a variance and the request has not been granted or has not been granted in the manner requested, the owner or aggrieved party may petition the cabinet to have the variance request reviewed and a final determination made by the cabinet. If not satisfied by the final determination of the cabinet , the party may seek administrative remedy from the cabinet under the provisions of KRS 151.182;

Items of general maintenance of a dam shall include provisions for at least the following: dams shall be mowed regularly; dams shall be free of trees and brush; animal burrows shall not be allowed on dams; slides, erosion and cracks that could pose problems to dams shall be properly repaired; action shall be taken to alleviate excessive wetness and abnormal seepage; appurtenances that are necessary for the proper operation and maintenance of the dam shall be kept in proper working condition;

Provisions shall be made whereby the cabinet will allow for staged renovation of dams that do not meet the criteria of the administrative regulations and shall clearly identify the circumstances under which staging is allowable and set a maximum time limit that may be allowed for bringing the dam into compliance. Other provisions shall require the owner to develop and maintain an emergency action plan, to provide interim insurance, bonding or other indemnification, and on a frequent basis as specified by the cabinet, to inspect the dam and report to the cabinet the status of any facilities or conditions of concern; and

If the cabinet has previously required a dam to be upgraded to meet a certain dam safety standard, it shall not require that the dam be upgraded again because of a change in the administrative regulation with regard to that same standard. However, if the owner proposes substantial construction on the dam or if the dam must be repaired due to indications of distress or to partial failure, the cabinet may require the owner to bring the dam into full compliance with current standards.

The cabinet shall establish guidelines on a case-by-case basis for gravity dams and other types of dams that are unusual to the Commonwealth, and shall follow recognized engineering practice.

Plans and specifications submitted to the cabinet shall be the responsibility of and signed by an engineer licensed by the Commonwealth and experienced in the design and construction of dams, as determined by the cabinet.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 285, § 8; 1978, ch. 206, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 405, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 2017 ch. 117, § 14, effective June 29, 2017.

151.295.
Regular inspections of dams and reservoirs.

The public safety and welfare requiring it, the secretary shall conduct a program of regular inspections of dams and reservoirs within the state. The frequency of such inspections shall be as determined by the secretary, who may establish different inspection intervals.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 285, § 9; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(9).

151.297.
Orders for remedy — Action by cabinet — Contracts or agreements for required work — Hearings.

Whenever the cabinet determines that any person to which a certificate of inspection has been issued has failed to comply with the conditions in said certificate or whenever the cabinet determines that life or property are or may be endangered by the failure or incapacity of any dam, reservoir, levee, embankment, or other water barrier, or by any other cause related to a dam or reservoir, levee, embankment, or other water barrier irrespective of any condition or the lack thereof in the certificate of inspection for said dam or reservoir, or in those instances where no certificate is required on the levee, embankment or other water barrier, the cabinet shall order the owner thereof to take such action as is necessary to render the dam, reservoir, levee, embankment, or other water barrier safe.

When the cabinet determines that the dam, reservoir, levee, embankment, or other water barrier has been abandoned; or where the owner fails, in the judgment of the cabinet, to take satisfactory action toward compliance with an order, issued pursuant to this section; or where an owner fails to maintain a satisfactory rate of progress toward full compliance therewith; or where in the judgment of the cabinet, the danger to life or property will not permit delay, the cabinet shall declare that an emergency exists and shall take such action as it deems necessary to render the dam, reservoir, levee, embankment, or other water barrier safe, which action may include, but is not limited to:

Taking full charge and control of the dam, reservoir, levee, embankment, or other water barrier;

Lowering the water level or emptying the reservoir;

Performing any necessary remedial or protective work at the site;

Taking such other steps as may be necessary to safeguard life and property; or

Removing the dam, reservoir, levee, embankment, or other water barrier.

The cabinet may continue such action until the dam, reservoir, levee, embankment, or other water barrier involved is rendered safe or the emergency requiring the action has ceased. The secretary is authorized to enter into contracts or agreements with other state, local, or federal agencies, or other persons, for work necessary to implement such necessary actions.

Any person to whom an order is directed pursuant to this section shall comply therewith immediately, but, on petition to the cabinet, may within five (5) working days have a hearing thereon.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 285, § 10; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(9); 1978, ch. 206, § 2, effective June 17, 1978.

151.299.
Liability for costs of cabinet emergency work — Action for recovery of costs — Foreclosure sale to satisfy judgment.

Whenever the secretary takes action authorized by KRS 151.297, the owner or owners of the dam or the dams creating the impoundment, or levee, embankment, or other water barriers at which such action was taken shall be jointly and severally liable for the costs of taking such action, including applicable overheads, and a lien in the amount of such costs shall be automatically created on all property owned by any such owner at or proximate to such dam or reservoir. The secretary shall file an action in the Circuit Court having jurisdiction over any owner or the owner’s property for the recovery of such costs, and may join all other owners in such action irrespective of any statutes to the contrary relating to jurisdiction or venue. Following the conclusion of such action the secretary may make application to the court for foreclosure sale of the property to satisfy any judgment obtained by the secretary.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 285, § 11; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(9).

151.300.
Right of entry by division employes. [Repealed.]

151.310.
Deposits in water without permit prohibited.

No person, city, county, or other political subdivision of the state shall deposit or cause to be deposited any matter that will in any way restrict or disturb the flow of water in the channel or in the floodway of any stream except where a permit has been issued for construction under KRS 151.250, or to encroach on the reservoir area of any dam authorized by the Congress of the United States, or under the jurisdiction of the Commonwealth, or any of its political subdivisions.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 35.

151.320.
Officers required to enforce law.

The mayor or chief executive officer of each city and the county judge/executive of each county, shall have the concurrent duty of enforcing with the cabinet, within their respective cities and counties, the provisions of KRS 151.250, 151.280 and 151.310 and rules and regulations issued thereunder.

When a violation of KRS 151.250, 151.280 or 151.310 within his jurisdiction is brought to the attention of a mayor or chief executive officer of a city or a county judge/executive, he shall immediately notify the cabinet of the location and details of such violation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 36.

151.330.
Water resources authority — Membership — Quorum — Officers — Executive board. [Repealed.]

151.340.
Executive director — Appointment — Duties. [Repealed.]

151.350.
Attorney general as legal officer. [Repealed.]

151.360.
Contracts with federal government for water resources projects — Participation in projects — Coordination of programs. [Repealed.]

151.370.
Powers of authority — Land acquisition. [Repealed.]

151.380.
Water resources fund, creation, uses. [Repealed.]

151.390.
Loans to governmental agencies for water resources project. [Repealed.]

151.400.
Loans — Interest rate — Security. [Repealed.]

151.410.
Application for assistance on water resources projects. [Repealed.]

151.420.
Revenue bonds for water resources projects — Use of proceeds — Interim receipts on temporary bonds — Tax exemption. [Repealed.]

151.430.
Payment of revenue bonds, source. [Repealed.]

151.440.
Revenue bonds, how secured — Trust indenture, contents. [Repealed.]

151.450.
Rights of holder of bonds or trustee. [Repealed.]

151.460.
Actions for penalties and injunctions.

It shall be the duty of the cabinet’s Office of Legal Services, or upon the secretary’s request, of the Attorney General, to bring an action for the recovery of the penalties herein provided for and to bring an action for a restraining order, temporary or permanent injunction, for the prevention or correction of a condition constituting or threatening to constitute a violation of this chapter, except as provided for in KRS 151.299.

All actions for penalties and injunctive relief for violations of this chapter shall be brought in the name of the Commonwealth of Kentucky by the cabinet’s Office of Legal Services, or upon the secretary’s request, by the Attorney General in the Circuit Court of the county in which the applicant resides, or in the Circuit Court having jurisdiction of the defendant.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 37; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(9); 1974, ch. 285, § 13; 1976, ch. 289, § 5; 1984, ch. 216, § 8, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 399, § 5, effective July 13, 1990.

151.550.
Community Flood Damage Abatement Program.

There is hereby created a Community Flood Damage Abatement Program within the Energy and Environment Cabinet.

It is hereby declared to be the purpose of the program to provide funds and technical assistance to local governments to initiate flood control projects and programs.

This program shall be administered by the secretary according to standards designed to promote adequate planning, construction and conservation measures to deal with water drainage problems.

Any local sponsoring community desiring to qualify for funding, must:

Make application to the cabinet which shall be in the form and manner prescribed by the cabinet;

Provide at no expense to the cabinet, all lands and easements necessary for project construction;

Agree to operate and maintain the project in a manner acceptable to the Commonwealth to insure the continued capacity of the project to prevent or minimize flood damages;

Submit evidence of the history of flooding within the last five (5) years;

Submit evidence of flood damage in dollars within the last five (5) years.

The cabinet shall have and exercise the power and authority to annually inspect the completed project to insure compliance with any of the provisions of this section or with any rules, regulations or orders adopted pursuant thereto, or with any of the conditions contained in subsection (4)(c) of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 293, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 2010, ch. 24, § 178, effective July 15, 2010.

151.560.
Flood Control Advisory Commission. [Repealed.]

151.570.
Duties of commission. [Repealed.]

151.580.
Negotiation with federal agencies for operation or maintenance of a navigable waterway within Kentucky — Approval of agreement — Appropriation.

The cabinet may negotiate with the appropriate federal agencies for the operation or maintenance of a navigable waterway within the state boundaries. The cabinet shall not initiate negotiation for operation or maintenance of a waterway under federal control unless the lack of an agreement jeopardizes the continued navigation of said waterway. Any agreement negotiated by the cabinet shall be subject to the approval of the Governor and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and, if the negotiated agreement will involve the expenditure of state funds, the General Assembly may appropriate funds to fulfill the terms of the negotiated agreement before the negotiated agreement shall become effective.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 418, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

151.600.
Public information program for flood plain management and flood hazard mitigation programs.

The water resources authority shall develop a public information program for use by local units of government which will assist them in the development of flood plain management and flood hazard mitigation programs. The authority shall make the public information program available statewide and easily accessible.

The public information program shall be designed to increase public awareness and community responsiveness toward flood plain management and shall include, but not be restricted to, the following:

Flood plain information training workshops for local officials and citizens;

Flood plain information booklets describing flood plain management, including flood warnings, overall preparedness, flood insurance, and flood proofing of buildings; and

Model flood plain development ordinances for adoption by local governmental units.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 173, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

151.601.
County and multicounty 2020 water management planning councils.

2020 water management planning councils shall be established for each county with the assistance of the appropriate area development district. Two (2) or more counties may form a multicounty 2020 water management planning council. The planning councils shall, as a minimum, be comprised of the following:

Each county judge-executive or mayor of an urban-county government, or his or her authorized representative;

One (1) representative selected by each community public water system, as defined in 401 KAR 8:010 sec. 1(71)(a), that provides water to persons in the county;

One (1) representative selected by a local health department in the county; and

One (1) representative selected by each city with a population equal to or greater than one thousand (1,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census that is not a water supplier or distributor, unless that city chooses to be represented by another member of the planning council.

If, after the 2020 water management planning council appointments have been made, a county judge/executive or mayor of an urban-county government determines that any areas of the county or urban county government remain unrepresented on the planning council, the county judge/executive or mayor of the urban-county government may appoint an individual to represent that area.

The county judge/executive or mayor of an urban-county government or the county judge/executive or the mayor’s designated representative shall serve as the chair of the 2020 water management planning council of which either the county judge/executive or the mayor is a member.

Members of the 2020 water management planning councils shall serve without pay but may be reimbursed by counties or appointing agencies for reasonable expenses incurred to carry out the work of the councils.

The area development districts shall develop a forum for the chairpersons of the 2020 water management planning councils or multicounty planning councils to meet on at least a quarterly basis for the purpose of developing regional service strategies consistent with the findings and purpose set out in KRS 224A.300.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 529, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2014, ch. 92, § 221, effective January 1, 2015.

151.603.
Consistency of each council’s long-range water supply plan with other provisions of law — Contents of plan — Function of planning councils.

Each 2020 water management planning council shall by July 1, 2001, develop a plan consistent with the county long-range water supply plan developed under KRS 151.114 and the water supply planning process set out in KRS Chapter 151 and administrative regulations of the cabinet and the purposes set out in KRS 224A.300. The plan shall include a water needs forecast for the county for dates five (5), ten (10), fifteen (15), and twenty (20) years after the year 2000. The plan shall include a strategy for delivering potable water as needed into the underserved and unserved areas of the county, and shall encourage the merger and consolidation of water systems. The authority may disapprove and direct redevelopment of a plan under this subsection for inconsistencies with the purposes set out in KRS 224A.300.

The 2020 water management planning councils or multicounty planning councils shall assume the role and function of the planning units established to implement the water supply planning process set out in KRS 151.114 and administrative regulations of the cabinet.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 529, § 4, effective July 14, 2000.

151.605.
Water service coordinators — Supplemental funding — Assistance by state agencies.

The 2020 water management planning councils or multicounty planning councils may employ a water service coordinator. Planning councils may jointly employ a water service coordinator. The water service coordinator shall assume the role and function of the county long-range planning representative appointed under KRS 151.114 and the water supply planning process set out in KRS Chapter 151 and administrative regulations of the cabinet. In addition, water service coordinators shall assist the 2020 water planning councils or multicounty planning councils in developing the plans required under KRS 151.603.

The Kentucky Infrastructure Authority may establish by administrative regulations a program to provide or supplement funding for a multicounty planning council water service coordinator for a period of three (3) years from July 14, 2000. There shall be no more than one (1) position funded per area development district.

All state agencies shall cooperate with and assist the 2020 water management planning councils as appropriate to accomplish the purposes set out in KRS 224A.300.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 529, § 5, effective July 14, 2000.